Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.690

State asthma plan.

(1) The department, in collaboration with its public and private partners, shall design a state asthma plan, based on clinically sound criteria including nationally recognized guidelines such as those established by the national asthma education prevention partnership expert panel report guidelines for the diagnosis and management of asthma.

(2) The plan shall include recommendations in the following areas:

(a) Evidence-based processes for the prevention and management of asthma;

(b) Data systems that support asthma prevalence reporting, including population disparities and practice variation in the treatment of asthma;

(c) Quality improvement strategies addressing the successful diagnosis and management of the disease; and

(d) Cost estimates and sources of funding for plan implementation.

(3) The department shall submit the completed state plan to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2005.

(4) The department shall implement the state plan recommendations made under subsection (2) of this section only to the extent that federal, state, or private funds, including grants, are available for that purpose.

[ 2009 c 518 s 8; 2005 c 462 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2005 c 462: See note following RCW 28A.210.370.